incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÆØÅabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzæøåcqwxzCQWXZéèêóòâôÉÊÈÓÔÒÂ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"   c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"  c="Proper noun"/>

    <sdef n="nt"  c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="f"   c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"   c="Masculine"/>

    <sdef n="sg"  c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"  c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="ind" c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/>
  </sdefs>


  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="sild/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pinseaft/an__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anen</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nane</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="od/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="papyr/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usane</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usar</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usen</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prosa__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pelargoni/um__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>umen</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pils__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nykleh/ank__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anka</l>
          <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anki</l>
          <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ank</l>
          <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enkene</l>
          <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enker</l>
          <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rang/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elet</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="preambel"><i>preamb</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="normalprosa"><i>normalprosa</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skremselspropaganda"><i>skremselspropaganda</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poststempel"><i>poststemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="retreatsenter"><i>retreatsent</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="råolje"><i>råolj</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sigarkasse"><i>sigarkass</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ruter"><i>ruter</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skatteprosent"><i>skatteprosent</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pelargonium"><i>pelargoni</i><par n="pelargoni/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sigøynarorkester"><i>sigøynarorkest</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sankthansaftan"><i>sankthansaft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjuandeklasse"><i>sjuandeklass</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="olsokeftan"><i>olsokeft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyårseftan"><i>nyårseft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="regionteater"><i>regionteat</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="shorts"><i>shorts</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perimeter"><i>perimet</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pygméstamme"><i>pygméstamm</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patina"><i>patina</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="riksdalar"><i>riksdalar</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
    <e lm="normannar"><i>normannar</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sankthanseftan"><i>sankthanseft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rangklasse"><i>rangklass</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plunder"><i>plund</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paranoia"><i>paranoia</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radiometer"><i>radiomet</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="påskeaftan"><i>påskeaft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rote"><i>rot</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyklehank"><i>nykleh</i><par n="nykleh/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reliktfauna"><i>reliktfauna</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="silder"><i>sild</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyttårseftan"><i>nyttårseft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="propaganda"><i>propaganda</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nykelhank"><i>nykelh</i><par n="nykleh/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pjaster"><i>pjaster</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pinseeftan"><i>pinseeft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oppstøyt"><i>oppstøyt</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
    <e lm="påskeeftan"><i>påskeeft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="økonomiklasse"><i>økonomiklass</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pils"><i>pils</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rangel"><i>rang</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sklerometer"><i>skleromet</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyårsaftan"><i>nyårsaft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="optometer"><i>optomet</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podagra"><i>podagra</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smellkulde"><i>smellkuld</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rollemønster"><i>rollemønst</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prosa"><i>prosa</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="russ"><i>russ</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
    <e lm="påske"><i>påsk</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="papyrus"><i>papyr</i><par n="papyr/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samanstøyt"><i>samanstøyt</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sequoia"><i>sequoia</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="olsokaftan"><i>olsokaft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prøverørsfoster"><i>prøverørsfost</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polarmåke"><i>polarmåk</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slamfilter"><i>slamfilt</i><par n="sild/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="piassava"><i>piassava</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sildeolje"><i>sildeolj</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyttårsaftan"><i>nyttårsaft</i><par n="pinseaft/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perestrojka"><i>perestrojka</i><par n="prosa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skylddalar"><i>skylddalar</i><par n="pils__n"/></e>
